District of Columbia statutes.
16-1034

Training program.

(a)

The Police force shall incorporate in its educational program for new law enforcement officers training in:

(1)

The nature, dimension, and causes of intrafamily offenses;

(2)

The legal rights and remedies available to a victim or perpetrator of an intrafamily offense;

(3)

The services and facilities available to a victim or perpetrator of an intrafamily offense;

(4)

The legal duties imposed on a police officer to enforce the provisions of this subchapter and to offer protection and assistance to a victim of an intrafamily offense; and

(5)

Techniques for handling an intrafamily offense that minimize the likelihood of injury to the officer and promote the safety of the victim.

(b)

The training shall stress the importance of enforcing the law against intrafamily offenses. The Police force may:

(1)

Utilize the resources of any law enforcement agency or community organization; and

(2)

Invite any community organization that provides counselling or assistance to victims of intrafamily offenses to help in planning and presenting the training program.

(c)

At least 20 hours of basic training in responding to an intrafamily offense shall be required of any new law enforcement officer prior to the law enforcement officer’s permanent appointment.

(d)

Any currently employed law enforcement officer shall be required to participate in an 8-hour course designed to familiarize the law enforcement officer with the dynamics of intrafamily offenses.

Apr. 30, 1991, D.C. Law 8-261, § 2(c)(2), 37 DCR 5001
1981 Ed., § 16-1034.